Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 4  of this 2020 special session Act are added to and made a part
of ORS 181A.355 to 181A.670.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) It is in the public interest to have trust and transparency in the hiring of law
enforcement officers.
(2) It is in the public interest to ensure that information  relating to allegations of mis-
conduct are not shielded in the employment process,  while ensuring due process and a fair
chance for police officers accused of misconduct in order  to promote the hiring of individuals
who represent the highest values of policing.
SECTION 3. (1) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training shall establish
a statewide online database of  suspensions and revocations of the certifications of police of-
ficers that is accessible by the public.
(2) The department shall publish information on the  database when the department sus-
pends or revokes  the certification of a police officer under ORS 181A.630, 181A.640 and
181A.650, including but not limited to:
(a) The name of the officer;
(b) The law enforcement unit at which the officer was employed; and
(c) A description of the facts underlying the suspension or revocation.
(3) The department shall publish the information required under  subsection (2) of this
section within 10 days after:
(a) The time for filing an appeal of the department’s decision under ORS 181A.650 has
passed and no appeal has been filed; or
(b) The decision of the department is appealed  under ORS 181A.650 and the department’s
decision has been sustained by the Court of Appeals or the appeal has been dropped.
(4) The department shall submit an annual report  to an appropriate committee of the
Legislative Assembly summarizing and analyzing the data in the database.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.775.
(b) “Personnel records” means the entire personnel file  of a police officer or reserve of-
ficer, including but not limited  to records of complaints and disciplinary action against the
officer.
(2) Before extending an  offer of employment to an applicant for a police officer or reserve
officer position, a law enforcement agency shall request and review the applicant’s  personnel
records from all law enforcement agencies in any jurisdiction at which the applicant was
formerly employed.
(3) A law enforcement agency shall provide the personnel records of a police officer  or
reserve officer who was employed by the law enforcement agency at any time to another  law
enforcement agency that requests  the records for review under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A law enforcement agency shall retain the  personnel records of a police officer or
reserve officer employed by the agency for at least 10 years  after the officer leaves employ-
ment with the agency.
(5)(a) A law enforcement agency that complies with subsection (2) of this section is im-
mune from civil liability for any  harm arising from relying on personnel records received
under subsection (2) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4207 (HB 4207-A) Page 2
(b) A law enforcement agency that complies with  subsection (3) of this section is immune
from civil liability for any harm arising from providing personnel  records under subsection
(3) of this section.
(c) This subsection does not limit the liability of a law enforcement agency that fails  to
request, provide or retain records as required by subsections (2) to (4) of this section.
(d) This subsection does not limit the liability of a law enforcement agency for negligent
hiring.
SECTION 5.  ORS 181A.830 is amended to read:
181A.830. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.311.
(b) “Public safety employee” means a certified reserve officer, corrections  officer, parole and
probation officer, police officer or youth correction  officer as those terms are defined in ORS
181A.355.
(2) A public body may not disclose a photograph of a public safety employee of the public body
without the written consent of the employee. This subsection  does not apply to the use by the public
body of a photograph of a public safety employee.
(3) A public body may not disclose  information about a personnel investigation of a public safety
employee of the public body if the investigation does not result in discipline of the employee.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply:
(a) When the public interest requires disclosure of the information.
(b) When the employee consents to disclosure in writing.
(c) When  disclosure is necessary for an investigation by the public body, the Department of
Public Safety Standards and Training or a citizen review body designated by the public body.
(d) To disclosures required under section 4 of this 2020 special session Act.
[(d)] (e) When the public body determines that nondisclosure of the information would  adversely
affect the confidence of the public in the public body.
(5) If an investigation of a  public safety employee of a public body results from a complaint, the
public body  may disclose to the complainant the disposition of the complaint and, to the extent the
public body considers necessary to explain the action of the public body on the complaint, a written
summary of information obtained in the investigation.
(6) A public body must notify a public safety employee of the public body if the public  body re-
ceives a request for:
(a) A photograph of the employee.
(b) Information about the employee that is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.345 or  192.355
(2) or (3).
(c) Information about the employee that is prohibited from disclosure by  subsection (3) of this
section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 181A.640 is amended to read:
181A.640. (1) The  Department of Public Safety Standards and Training may deny the application
for training, or deny, suspend or revoke the certification,  of any public safety officer or instructor,
except a youth correction officer or fire service professional, after written  notice and hearing con-
sistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that:
(a) The public safety officer or instructor falsified any information submitted on  the application
for certification or on any documents submitted  to the Board on Public Safety Standards and
Training or the department.
(b) The public safety officer or  instructor has been convicted of a crime or violation in this state
or any other jurisdiction.
(c) The public safety officer or instructor does not meet the applicable minimum  standards,
minimum training or the terms and conditions established under ORS 181A.410 (1)(a) to (d).
(d) The public safety officer failed to comply with ORS 181A.790 (3)(b).
Enrolled House Bill 4207 (HB 4207-A) Page 3
(2) The department shall deny the application for training or deny,  suspend or revoke the
certification of a police officer, after written notice and  hearing consistent with the pro-
visions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that:
(a) The officer  has a conviction for any offense designated under the law of the jurisdic-
tion where the conviction occurred as being punishable as a felony or as a crime for  which
a maximum term of imprisonment of more than one year may be imposed;
(b) The officer has a conviction in any  jurisdiction for any offense involving the unlawful
use, possession, delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance,  narcotic or dangerous
drug, except for offenses involving the use or possession of marijuana;
(c) The officer has a conviction in any jurisdiction for any offense involving domestic vi-
olence, as defined in ORS 135.230;
(d) The officer has a conviction in any jurisdiction for any  offense involving abuse, as
defined in ORS 107.705, of a child who is under 18 years of age and is a natural child,  adopted
child, stepchild, a child under the guardianship of,  or a child who regularly resides or for-
merly resided in the same household as, the officer;
(e) The officer is a sex offender as defined in ORS 163A.005; or
(f) The officer has been discharged for cause from employment as  a police officer as a
result of intentional conduct performed under the color of office to:
(A) Obtain false confessions;
(B) Make false arrests;
(C) Create  or use falsified evidence, including false testimony, or to destroy evidence to
create a false impression;
(D) Compel a person to abstain from doing, or to do, any act that the person has  a legal
right to do or abstain from doing;
(E) Deprive, or attempt to deprive, another person or persons of their legal rights; or
(F) Gain advantage for a public or private safety agency or for personal gain.
[(2)] (3) The department shall deny, suspend or revoke the certification of  a fire service profes-
sional, after written notice and hearing consistent with the  provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon
a finding that the fire service professional has been convicted in  this state of a crime listed in ORS
137.700 or in any other jurisdiction of a crime that, if committed in  this state, would constitute a
crime listed in ORS 137.700.
[(3)] (4) The department may deny, suspend or revoke the certification of  any fire service pro-
fessional after written notice and hearing consistent  with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based
upon a finding:
(a) That the fire service professional falsified any information submitted on the application  for
certification or on any documents submitted to the board or the department; or
(b) Consistent with ORS  670.280, that the fire service professional is not fit to receive or hold
the certification as a result  of conviction of a crime in this state, or in any other jurisdiction, other
than a crime described in subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section.
[(4)] (5) The department shall deny, suspend  or revoke the certification of any public safety of-
ficer or instructor, except a  youth correction officer, after written notice and hearing consistent
with the provisions  of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that the public safety officer or instructor
has been discharged for cause from employment as a public safety officer.
[(5)] (6) The department, in consultation with the board, shall adopt rules specifying those
crimes and violations for which a conviction requires the denial, suspension  or revocation of the
certification of a public safety officer or instructor.
[(6)] (7) Notwithstanding the lapse, suspension, revocation or surrender of the certification of a
public safety officer or instructor, the department may:
(a) Proceed with any investigation of, or any action or disciplinary proceedings against,  the
public safety officer or instructor; or
(b) Revise or render void an order suspending or revoking the certification.
Enrolled House Bill 4207 (HB 4207-A) Page 4
[(7)] (8) The department shall deny, suspend or revoke the accreditation of a training or educa-
tional program or any course, subject,  facility or instruction thereof if the program, course, subject,
facility or instruction is  not in compliance with rules adopted or conditions prescribed under ORS
181A.410 (1)(g) or 181A.590 (3).
[(8)] (9) When the department completes an investigation  relating to a person’s qualifications for
employment, training or certification under this section, the department shall issue a report.
[(9)] (10) In cases  involving a proposed denial of training or certification of a public safety of-
ficer or instructor by the department, the department has jurisdiction to proceed with  any action
against the public safety officer or instructor  notwithstanding a subsequent change in the employ-
ment status of the officer or instructor, if:
(a) The department has issued a notice of intent to deny training or certification; and
(b) The officer or instructor has requested a hearing.
SECTION 7.
(1) Section 3 of this 2020 special session Act becomes operative on January
1, 2021.
(2) The Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training may take any action before
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section to enable the department, on and
after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to exercise the  duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department by section 3 of this  2020 special session
Act.
SECTION 8. Sections 3 and 4 of this 2020  special session Act do not affect a collective
bargaining agreement entered into before the effective date  of this 2020 special session Act,
to the extent  compliance with the provisions of sections 3 and 4 of this 2020 special session
Act would conflict with or impair the execution of the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement.
SECTION 9.
This 2020 special session Act being necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health  and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2020 special
session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by House June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4207 (HB 4207-A) Page 5